Utah statutes.
30-3-15.4.   Salaries and expenses.

Salaries of persons appointed under the foregoing sections shall be fixed by the county legislative body of the county in which they serve. Office space, furnishings, equipment, and supplies for family court commissioners and conciliation staff shall be provided by the county. The expenses and salaries of family court commissioners and conciliation staff shall be paid from county funds.

